Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-604.05
Birth certificate; restriction on filing; social security number required; exception; use; release of data to Social Security Administration.

(1) The department shall not file (a) a certificate of live birth, (b) a certificate of delayed birth registration for a registrant who is under twenty-five years of age when an application for such certificate is filed, (c) a certificate of live birth filed after adoption of a Nebraska-born person who is under twenty-five years of age or a person born outside of the jurisdiction of the United States, or (d) a certificate of live birth issued pursuant to section 71-628 unless the social security number or numbers issued to the parents are furnished by the person seeking to register the birth. No such certificate may be amended to show paternity unless the social security number of the father is furnished by the person requesting the amendment. The social security number shall not be required if no social security number has been issued to the parent or if the social security number is unknown.

(2) Social security numbers (a) shall be recorded on the birth certificate but shall not be considered part of the birth certificate and (b) shall only be used for the purpose of enforcement of child support orders in Nebraska as permitted by Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, or as permitted by section 7(a) of the federal Privacy Act of 1974, as amended.

(3) The department may release data to the Social Security Administration which is necessary to obtain a social security number and which is contained on the birth certificate of any individual who has applied for or is receiving medicaid or Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits. The department shall make such data available only for the purpose of obtaining a social security number for the individual.

(4) The department shall provide to the Social Security Administration each parent's name and social security number collected in the birth certification process as required by the federal Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 28;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 62;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 516;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 136;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 89;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 405;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 34.